Utah statutes.
36-11-106.   Reports are public documents.
(1)  Any person may:
(a)  without charge, inspect a license application or financial report filed
with the lieutenant governor in accordance with this chapter; and
(b)  make a copy of a report after paying for the actual costs of the copy.
(2)  The lieutenant governor shall make financial reports filed in accordance
with this chapter available for viewing on the Internet at the lieutenant
governor's website within seven calendar days after the report is received by
the lieutenant governor.
